Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8215
Emergency medical service, defined.

Emergency medical service means the organization responding to a perceived
individual need for medical
care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological
illness or injury.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB646, § 3.